District of Columbia statutes.
9-401.17

Contracts for repairs not to exceed 5 years.

Contracts for repairs to pavements may be made for periods not exceeding 5 years, and subject to annual appropriation therefor by Congress.

July 18, 1888, 25 Stat. 319, ch. 676
1981 Ed., § 7-626.
1973 Ed., § 7-621.